District of Columbia statutes.
2-1226.40

Relationship to Green Building Act, the Water Pollution Control Act, and other laws.

Where the environmental standards established by this part differ from those in Chapter 14A of Title 6, subchapter II of Chapter 1 of Title 8 [§ 8-103.01 et seq.], or other District law or regulation, the more stringent standard shall apply.

Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-138, § 460, 55 DCR 1689
This section is referenced in § 2-1226.40b.